District of Columbia statutes.
38-757.01

Repealed

Applicability.

Repealed.

June 19, 2012, D.C. Law 19-142, § 701, 59 DCR 3642
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 7009, 59 DCR 8025
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7013, 62 DCR 10905
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added the subsection (a) designation; substituted “through September 30, 2013” for “upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan” in (a); and added (b).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010b, see § 2(j) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-179, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 424).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section 701 of D.C. Law 19-345, see § 7009 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7009 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-142, § 701, see § 7010b of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010b, repealing D.C. Law 19-142, § 701, see § 2(k) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-142, § 701, see § 7010b of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 20-155, § 7010b, repealing D.C. Law 19-142, § 701, see § 2(k) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-142 and repeal of this chapter, see § 7016(j) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Section 7016 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that Sections 7001, 7004, 7007, 7009, 7011, and 7015 of the act shall apply as of June 19, 2012.